Tennessee statutes. Title 58 Military Affairs, Emergencies and Civil Defense
Part 3

P.O.W.-M.I.A. Recognition

58-4-301. Display of P.O.W.-M.I.A. flag over state capitol.

On days that neither house of the general assembly is in session during the month of September, the P.O.W.-M.I.A. flag must be displayed over the state capitol in accordance with § 4-1-406(a), on any day the United States flag is displayed, in order to increase public awareness of the P.O.W.-M.I.A. issue and to gain public support for the efforts of the United States government to resolve this matter.

Beginning June 30, 2017, the P.O.W.-M.I.A. flag must be displayed daily below the United States flag in War Memorial Plaza and in Vietnam Veterans Park.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (a), the P.O.W.-M.I.A. flag may be displayed over the state capitol, in accordance with § 4-1-406(a), on any day the United States flag is displayed over the state capitol.

Acts 1994, ch. 713, § 1; 2006, ch. 857, § 1; 2011, ch. 238, § 1; 2017, ch. 437, § 1.

Cross-References. P.O.W.-M.I.A. Recognition Week, § 15-2-107.

58-4-302. Donations of P.O.W.-M.I.A. flags.

Any individual or group may donate a P.O.W.-M.I.A. flag to a county, municipal or state government for the display of the flag pursuant to this part.

In addition to the display of the flag over the state capitol pursuant to § 58-4-301(b), the P.O.W.-M.I.A. flag may be displayed by a county or municipal government at the following buildings on any day the United States flag is displayed:

The courthouse or other building that serves as the main administrative building of the county; or

The building that serves as the city or town hall or main administrative building of the municipality.

If the flag is displayed, it shall be displayed in accordance with § 4-1-406(a).

Acts 1994, ch. 713, § 1; 2011, ch. 238, § 2.

58-4-303. Display and maintenance of flags.

If a P.O.W.-M.I.A. flag is donated for display to and is displayed by the state, county or municipal government in accordance with this part, it shall be raised and lowered at the same time, and maintained in the same manner, as the state and United States flags. The county, city, or state government will utilize current flag poles and halyard to display the P.O.W.-M.I.A. flag.

Acts 1994, ch. 713, § 1; 2011, ch. 238, § 3.

58-4-304. Hours of display — Flag design.

The P.O.W.-M.I.A. flag, which depicts a prisoner's profile against the background of a P.O.W. watchtower, if displayed, shall be displayed in accordance with this part during normal business hours.

Acts 1994, ch. 713, § 1; 2011, ch. 238, § 4.

58-4-305. “Public building” defined.

For purposes of this part, “public building” is defined according to § 68-120-203.

Acts 1994, ch. 713, § 1.

58-4-306. Welcome centers.

The P.O.W.-M.I.A. flag, as described in § 58-4-304, may be displayed at each welcome center operated by the department of tourist development, and, if so displayed, shall be third in order on the flagpole after the flag of the United States of America and the Tennessee state flag. When the P.O.W.-M.I.A. flag is so displayed, it shall be displayed during the same hours and maintained in the same manner as the flag of the United States of America and the Tennessee state flag are displayed and maintained at the respective welcome centers operated by the department of tourist development, notwithstanding § 58-4-304 to the contrary. Flags displayed pursuant to this section shall be donated in accordance with § 58-4-302 and no state funds shall be expended to purchase the flags.

Acts 2006, ch. 857, § 2.

Chapters 5, 6

[Reserved]